Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1149.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 704. Residential building inspectors.In addition to any other requirements from the department, a residential building inspector shall also complete five hours of continuing education in recognizing faulty construction practices, including proper installation of stucco, the laws and legal liability of builders in faulty construction practices and the remedies available under Federal or State law for homeowners 123456789101112131415161718 in addressing faulty construction practices.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1149PN1270 - 2 - 12